Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.115

Judge serving district comprising more than one county—Reimbursement for travel expenses.

Whenever a judge of the superior court shall serve a district comprising more than one county, such judge shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in connection with business of the court in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended for travel from his or her residence to the other county or counties in his or her district and return.

[ 2011 c 336 s 14; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: "If any provision of this 1976 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of this 1976 amendatory act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 182.]

Effective date—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect on July 1, 1976." [1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 183.]